North Carolina statutes. Chapter 53C. Regulation of Banks.
Article 6. Bank Operations.

§ 53C-6-1.
Loans and extensions of credit.

A bank may make a loan or extension of credit secured by the pledge of its own shares or the shares of its holding company, provided:

When a bank exercises its security interest in shares of the bank or its holding company, it shall dispose of all of the shares within a period of six months. If the shares have not been disposed of within six months, the shares shall be charged to profit and loss and no longer carried as an asset of the bank. The Commissioner may extend the six-month period not to exceed an additional six months.

A bank may not extend credit to finance the purchase of or to carry shares of the bank or the shares of its holding company. For purposes of this subsection, the phrase “to carry” has the meaning set forth in 12 C.F.R. Part 221, as promulgated by the Federal Reserve Board.

Loans and Extensions of Credit — Limitations:

The total loans and extensions of credit, both direct and indirect, by a bank to a person, other than a municipal corporation for money borrowed, including in the liabilities of a company the liabilities of the several members of the company, outstanding at one time and not fully secured, as determined in a manner consistent with subdivision (2) of this subsection, by collateral having a market value at least equal to the amount of the loan or extension of credit, shall not exceed the greater of (i) fifteen percent (15%) of the sum of the bank’s capital plus those portions of the bank’s allowance for loan and lease losses, deferred tax assets, and intangible assets that are excluded from the bank’s capital under 12 C.F.R. Part 325 or (ii) the amount permitted for national banks in this State by statute or regulation of the Comptroller of the Currency.

The total loans and extensions of credit, both direct and indirect, by a bank to a person outstanding at one time and fully secured by readily marketable collateral having a market value, as determined by reliable and continuously available price quotations, at least equal to the amount of the loan or extension of credit outstanding, shall not exceed the greater of (i) ten percent (10%) of the sum of the bank’s capital plus those portions of the bank’s allowance for loan and lease losses, deferred tax assets, and intangible assets that are excluded from the bank’s capital under 12 C.F.R. Part 325 or (ii) the amount permitted for national banks by statute or regulation of the Comptroller of the Currency. This limitation shall be separate from and in addition to the limitation contained in subdivision (1) of this subsection.

The following shall not be considered as extensions of credit within the meaning of this section; provided that the limitations of this subsection shall not apply to loans or obligations to the extent that they are secured or covered by guarantees or by commitments or agreements to take over or purchase the same made by any federal reserve bank or by the United States or any department, board, bureau, commission, or establishment of the United States, including any corporation wholly owned, directly or indirectly, by the United States:

The discount of bills of exchange drawn in good faith against actual existing values.

The discount of solvent trade acceptances or other solvent commercial or business paper actually owned by the person negotiating the same.

Loans or extensions of credit secured by a segregated deposit account in the lending bank.

The purchase of bankers’ acceptances of the kind described in section 13 of the Federal Reserve Act and issued by other depository institutions.

The purchase of any notes and the making of any loans secured by not less than a like face amount of bonds of the United States or any agency of the United States; or other obligations guaranteed by the United States government or the State of North Carolina; or certificates of indebtedness of the United States, or agency thereof; or other obligations guaranteed by the United States government.

For purposes of this subsection, the following definitions and conditions apply:

“Person” includes an individual or a corporation, partnership, trust, association, joint venture, pool, syndicate, sole proprietorship, unincorporated organization, or any other form of entity not specifically listed; provided, the term “person” shall not include (i) a clearing organization registered with the Commodity Futures Trading Commission (or its successor) or the Securities and Exchange Commission (or its successor) or any federal banking agency or (ii) a bank’s affiliates.

Loans or extensions of credit to one person include loans made to other persons when the proceeds of the loans or extensions of credit are to be used for the direct benefit of the first person or the persons are engaged in a common enterprise.

For purposes of this section, extensions of credit by a bank to a person shall include the bank’s credit exposures to the person in derivative transactions with the bank.

“Derivative transaction” includes any transaction that is a contract, agreement, swap, warrant, note, or option that is based, in whole or in part, on the value of, any interest in, or any quantitative measure or the occurrence of any event relating to one or more commodities, securities, debt instruments, currencies, interest or other rates, indices, or assets.

Credit exposure to a person in connection with a derivative transaction shall be determined based on an amount that the bank reasonably determines, in accordance with customary industry practices under the terms of the derivative transaction or otherwise, would be its loss if the person were to default on the date of determination, taking into account any netting and collateral arrangements and any guarantees or other credit enhancements, provided that the bank may elect to determine credit exposure on the basis of such other method of determining credit exposure as may be permitted by the bank’s primary federal regulator.

The Commissioner shall monitor the lending activities of banks under this section for undue credit concentrations and inadequate risk diversification that could adversely affect the safety and soundness of the banks.

Rules adopted by the Commissioner to ensure that extensions of credit made by banks are in keeping with sound lending practices and to promote the purposes of this Chapter shall not prohibit a bank from making any extension of credit that is a permitted extension of credit for a federally chartered institution.

Any bank may, by resolution duly passed at a meeting of its board of directors or a board-authorized committee, request the Commissioner to suspend the limitations on loans set forth in this section as the limitations may apply to any particular loan (i) on the bank’s books that then exceeds such limitations, or (ii) which the bank desires to make or modify in a manner that would not otherwise be permitted in the absence of a suspension of such limitations. Upon receipt of a duly certified copy of such resolution, the Commissioner may, in the Commissioner’s discretion and subject to such requirements, limitations, and conditions as the Commissioner deems appropriate, suspend the limitations on loans set forth in this section insofar as they apply to the loan in question.

History.

2012-56, s. 4; 2013-29, ss. 9, 10.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-29, ss. 9, 10, effective April 16, 2013, in subdivisions (b)(1) and (b)(2), added “(i)” following “exceed the greater of” and substituted “sum of the bank’s capital plus those portions of the bank’s allowance for loan and lease losses, deferred tax assets, and intangible assets that are excluded from the bank’s capital under 12 C.F.R. Part 325 or (ii) the amount” for “capital of the bank or the percentage.”; and added subsection (e).

§ 53C-6-2.
Deposits.

A bank may, consistent with applicable law and safe and sound banking practices, offer all types of deposit accounts upon such terms and conditions as the bank considers appropriate.

A bank shall secure insurance for its deposits from the FDIC.

History.

2012-56, s. 4.

§ 53C-6-3.
Securing deposits.

A bank may not create a lien on its assets or otherwise secure the repayment of a deposit, except as authorized or required by this section, other laws of this State, or federal law.

A bank may pledge its assets to secure a deposit of the government of this State or any other state, any agency or political subdivision of this State or any other state, the United States government, any agency or instrumentality of the United States, or any Indian tribe recognized by the United States government as eligible for the services provided to Indian tribes by the Secretary of the Interior because of its status as an Indian tribe.

This section does not prohibit the pledge of assets by a bank to secure the repayment of money borrowed.

An act, deed, conveyance, pledge, or contract in violation of this section is void.

History.

2012-56, s. 4.

§ 53C-6-4.
Minors.

A bank may issue and operate a deposit account in the name of a minor or in the name of two or more individuals, one or more of whom are minors, and receive payments, pay withdrawals, accept a pledge of the account, issue automated teller machine (ATM) and debit cards, contract for overdraft protection, and act in any other manner with respect to the account on the order of the minor with like effect as if the minor were of full age and legal capacity. Any payment to or at the direction of a minor is a discharge of the bank to the extent thereof. The account shall be held for the exclusive right and benefit of the minor and any joint owners, free from the control of all other persons except creditors. A minor who obtains a deposit account from a bank under this subsection, whether individually or together with others, is bound by the terms of the deposit account agreement to the same extent as if the minor were of full age and legal capacity.

Any bank may lease a safe deposit box to a minor or to two or more individuals, one or more of whom are minors. With respect to any such lease, a bank may deal with the minor in all regards as if the minor were of full age and legal capacity. A minor entering a lease agreement with a bank under this subsection, whether individually or together with others, is bound by the terms of the safe deposit box agreement to the same extent as if the minor were of full age and legal capacity.

If a minor with a deposit account, other than a joint account with right of survivorship or a Payable on Death account, dies, a parent or legal guardian of the minor may access and withdraw the funds on deposit, and the bank is discharged to the extent of any withdrawal. If a minor with a safe deposit box dies, the provisions of

G.S. 28A-15-13

shall control the opening, inventory, and release of contents of the safe deposit box.

This section shall not affect the law governing transactions with minors in cases outside the scope of this section, including transactions that constitute an extension of credit to the minor.

History.

2012-56, s. 4.

§ 53C-6-5.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

§ 53C-6-6.
Joint accounts.

Any two or more individuals may establish a joint deposit account by written contract. The deposit account shall be held for them as joint tenants. The account also may be held pursuant to

G.S. 41-2.1

of the General Statutes and have the incidents set forth in that section. If the account is held pursuant to

G.S. 41-2.1

, the contract shall set forth that fact.

Unless the individuals establishing a joint account have agreed with the bank that withdrawals require more than one signature, payment by the bank to, or at the direction of, any joint tenant designated in the contract authorized by this section shall be a total discharge of the bank’s obligation as to the amount so paid.

Funds in a joint account established with right of survivorship shall belong to the surviving joint tenant or tenants upon the death of a joint tenant, and the funds shall be subject only to the personal representative’s right of collection as set forth in G.S. 28A-15-10(a)(3), or as provided in

G.S. 41-2.1

if the account is established pursuant to the provisions of that section. Payment by the bank of funds in the joint account to a surviving joint tenant or tenants shall terminate the personal representative’s authority under G.S. 28A-15-10(a)(3) to collect against the bank for the funds so paid, but the personal representative’s authority to collect such funds from the surviving joint tenant or tenants is not terminated.

A pledge of a joint account by any one or more of the joint tenants, unless otherwise specifically agreed between the bank and all joint tenants in writing, shall be a valid pledge and transfer of the account or of the amount so pledged, shall be binding upon all joint tenants, shall not operate to sever or terminate the joint ownership of all or any part of the account, and shall survive the death of any joint tenant.

A bank is not liable to joint tenants for complying in good faith with a writ of execution, garnishment, attachment, levy, or other legal process that appears to have been issued by a court or other authority of competent jurisdiction and seeks funds held in the name of any one or more of the joint tenants.

Persons establishing a joint account with right of survivorship under this section shall sign a statement showing their election of the right of survivorship in the account and containing language set forth in a conspicuous manner and substantially similar to the following:

“BANK (or name of institution)
JOINT ACCOUNT WITH RIGHT OF SURVIVORSHIP

G.S. 53C-6-6

We understand that by establishing a joint account under the provisions of North Carolina General Statute 53C-6-6 that:

The bank (or name of institution) may pay the money in the account to, or on the order of, any person named as a joint holder of the account unless we have agreed with the bank that withdrawals require more than one signature; and

Upon the death of one joint owner, the money remaining in the account will belong to the surviving joint owners and will not pass by inheritance to the heirs of the deceased joint owner or be controlled by the deceased joint owner’s will.

_______________

_______________ ”

This section does not repeal or modify any provision of law relating to estate taxes.

Any joint tenant may terminate a joint account.

Where a joint account is held by two or more individuals and a joint tenant does not wish for the account to be terminated but requests to be removed from the account, the bank shall remove the joint tenant from the account. The joint account shall continue in the names of the remaining tenant or tenants. Any joint tenant who requested to be removed from an account remains liable for any debts incurred in connection with the joint account during the period in which the individual was a named joint tenant.

Any joint account created under the provisions of G.S. 53-146.1 as it existed prior to October 1, 2012, shall for all purposes be governed by the provisions of this section on and after October 1, 2012, and any reference to G.S. 53-146.1 in any document concerning the account shall be deemed a reference to this section.

This section shall not be deemed exclusive. Deposit accounts not conforming to this section shall be governed by other applicable provisions of the General Statutes or the common law, as appropriate.

History.

2012-56, s. 4; 2013-29, s. 11.

§ 53C-6-7.
Payable on Death accounts.

If any individual establishing a deposit account executes a written agreement with the bank containing a statement that it is executed pursuant to the provisions of this section and providing for the account to be held in the name of the individual as owner for one or more beneficiaries, the account and any balance thereof shall be held as a Payable on Death account. The account shall have the following incidents:

Any owner during the owner’s lifetime may change any designated beneficiary by a written direction to the bank.

If there are two or more owners of a Payable on Death account, the owners shall own the account as joint tenants with right of survivorship and, except as otherwise provided in this section, the account shall have the incidents set forth in

G.S. 53C-6-6

.

Unless the individual establishing the Payable on Death account has agreed with the bank that a withdrawal requires more than one signature, payment by the bank to, on the order of, or at the direction of any owner is a total discharge of the bank’s obligation as to the paid amount.

If any beneficiary is an individual, there may be one or more beneficiaries, each of whom shall be an individual, and the following requirements shall apply:

If only one beneficiary is living and of legal age at the death of the last surviving owner, the beneficiary shall be the owner of the account and payment by the bank to the owner shall be a total discharge of the bank’s obligation as to the amount paid. If two or more beneficiaries are living at the death of the last surviving owner, they shall be owners of the account as joint tenants with right of survivorship as provided in

G.S. 53C-6-6

, and payment by the bank to the owners or any of the owners shall be a total discharge of the bank’s obligation as to the amount paid.

If only one beneficiary is living and that beneficiary is not of legal age at the death of the last surviving owner, the bank shall transfer the funds in the account to the general guardian or guardian of the estate, if any, of the minor beneficiary. If no guardian of the minor beneficiary has been appointed, the bank shall hold the funds in a similar interest-bearing account in the name of the minor until the minor reaches the age of majority or until a duly appointed guardian withdraws the funds.

If any beneficiary is not an individual, there shall be only one beneficiary.

If one or more owners survive the last surviving beneficiary who was a natural person, or if a beneficiary who is an entity other than a natural person should cease to exist before the death of the owner, the account shall become an individual account of the owner, or a joint account with right of survivorship of the owners, and shall have the legal incidents of an individual account in a case of a single owner or a joint account with right of survivorship, as provided in G.S. 53C-6-6, in the case of multiple owners.

Prior to the death of the last surviving owner, no beneficiary shall have any ownership interest in a Payable on Death account. Funds in a Payable on Death account established pursuant to this subsection shall belong to the beneficiary or beneficiaries upon the death of the last surviving owner, and the funds shall be subject only to the personal representative’s right of collection as set forth in G.S. 28A-15-10(a)(1). Payment by the bank of funds in the Payable on Death account to the beneficiary or beneficiaries shall terminate the personal representative’s authority under G.S. 28A-15-10(a)(1) to collect against the bank for the funds so paid, but the personal representative’s authority to collect such funds from the beneficiary or beneficiaries is not terminated.

A pledge of a Payable on Death account by any owner, unless otherwise specifically agreed between the bank and all owners in writing, is a valid pledge and transfer of the account or of the pledged amount, is binding upon all owners and beneficiaries, does not operate to sever or terminate the joint ownership of all or any part of the account, and survives the death of any owner or any beneficiary.The individual establishing an account under this subsection shall sign a statement containing language set forth in a conspicuous manner and substantially similar to the following language. The following language may be on a signature card or in an explanation of the account that is set out in a separate document whose receipt is acknowledged by the individual establishing the account:

“BANK (or name of institution)
PAYABLE ON DEATH ACCOUNT

G.S. 53C-6-7

I (or we) understand that by establishing a Payable on Death account under the provisions of North Carolina General Statute 53C-6-7 that:1. During my (or our) lifetime I (or we), individually or jointly, may withdraw the money in the account.2. By written direction to the bank (or name of institution) I (or we), individually or jointly, may change the beneficiary or beneficiaries.3. Upon my (or our) death, the money remaining in the account will belong to the beneficiary or beneficiaries, and the money will not be inherited by my (or our) heirs or be controlled by will. _______________ ”

This section shall not be deemed exclusive. Deposit accounts not conforming to this section shall be governed by other applicable provisions of the General Statutes or the common law, as appropriate.

No addition to the accounts, nor any withdrawal, payment, or change of beneficiary, shall affect the nature of the account as Payable on Death accounts or affect the right of any owner to terminate the account.

This section does not repeal or modify any provisions of law relating to estate taxes.

Any Payable on Death account created under the provisions of

G.S. 53-146.2

, as it existed prior to October 1, 2012, shall for all purposes be governed by the provisions of this section on and after October 1, 2012, and any reference to

G.S. 53-146.2

in any document concerning the account shall be deemed a reference to this section.

History.

2012-56, s. 4; 2013-29, s. 12; 2017-165, s. 6.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2013-29, s. 12, effective April 16, 2013, added subsection (e).

Session Laws 2017-165, s. 6, effective July 21, 2017, in the introductory paragraph of subsection (a), substituted “individual” for “natural person” twice, and substituted “executes” for “shall execute”; rewrote subdivision (a)(3), which read: “Any owner may withdraw funds by writing checks or otherwise, as set forth in the account contract, and receive payment in cash or check payable to the owner’s personal order.”; in subdivision (a)(4), substituted “any beneficiary is an individual” for “the beneficiary is a natural person”, inserted “each of whom shall be an individual”, and inserted “requirements”; substituted “any beneficiary is not an individual” for “the beneficiary is an entity other than a natural person” in subdivision (a)(5); added subdivision (a)(8); and, in the undesignated paragraph in the first sentence, substituted “individual” for “natural person” in the beginning, substituted “following language” for “language set out below” at the end, and, in the second sentence, inserted “following” near the beginning and substituted “individual” for “person” near the end.

§ 53C-6-8.
Personal agency accounts.

Any person may establish a personal agency account by written contract containing a statement that it is executed pursuant to the provisions of this section. A personal agency account may be any type of deposit account. The written contract shall name an agent who shall have authority to act on behalf of the depositor in the manner set out in this subsection. The agent shall have the authority to do the following:

Make, sign, or execute checks drawn on the account or otherwise make withdrawals from the account.

Endorse checks made payable to the principal for deposit only into the account.

Deposit cash or negotiable instruments, including instruments endorsed by the principal, into the account.

A person establishing an account under this section shall sign a statement containing language substantially similar to the following in a conspicuous manner:

“BANK (or name of institution)
PERSONAL AGENCY ACCOUNT

G.S. 53C-6-8

The undersigned understands that by establishing a personal agency account under the provisions of North Carolina General Statute 53C-6-8, the agent named in the account may:1. Sign checks drawn on the account.2. Make deposits into the account.The undersigned also understand that if the undersigned is a natural person, upon his or her death, the money remaining in the account will be controlled by his or her will or inherited by his or her heirs. _______________ ”

An account created under the provisions of this section grants no ownership right or interest in the agent. Upon the death of the principal, there is no right of survivorship to the account, and the authority set out in subsection (a) of this section terminates.

The written contract referred to in subsection (a) of this section shall provide that the principal may elect to extend the authority of the agent set out in subsection (a) of this section to act on behalf of the principal in regard to the account, notwithstanding the subsequent incapacity or mental incompetence of the principal. If the principal is an individual and elects to extend the authority of the agent, then upon the subsequent incapacity or mental incompetence of the principal, the agent may continue to exercise the authority, without the requirement of bond or of accounting to any court, until the agent receives actual knowledge that the authority has been terminated. The duly qualified guardian of the estate of the incapacitated or incompetent principal, or the duly appointed attorney-in-fact for the incapacitated or incompetent principal acting pursuant to a durable power of attorney, as defined in

G.S. 32A-8

[see now

G.S. 32C-1-102

], which grants to the attorney-in-fact the authority in regard to the account that is granted to the agent by the written contract executed pursuant to the provisions of this section, shall have the power, upon notifying the agent and providing written notice to the bank where the personal agency account is established, to terminate the agent’s authority to act on behalf of the principal with respect to the account. Upon termination of the agent’s authority, the agent shall account to the guardian or attorney-in-fact for all actions of the agent in regard to the account during the incapacity or incompetence of the principal. If the principal is an individual and does not elect to extend the authority of the agent, then upon the subsequent incapacity or mental incompetence of the principal, the authority of the agent set out in subsection (a) of this section terminates.

When an account under this section has been established, all or part of the account or any interest or dividend may be paid on a check made, signed, or executed by the agent. In the absence of actual knowledge that the principal has died or that the agency created by the account has been terminated, the payment shall be valid and sufficient discharge to the bank for payment so made.

A personal agency account shall have only one owner and one agent. The owner shall retain the authority to change the named agent on the personal agency account.

Any personal agency account created under the provisions of G.S. 53-146.3, as it existed prior to October 1, 2012, shall for all purposes be governed by the provisions of this section on and after October 1, 2012, and any reference to G.S. 53-146.3 in any document concerning the account shall be deemed a reference to this section.

History.

2012-56, s. 4; 2013-29, s. 13; 2017-165, s. 7.

§ 53C-6-9.
Accounts opened by adults for minors.

One or more adults may open and maintain a custodial deposit account for or in the name of a minor and using the minor’s taxpayer identification number. Unless otherwise provided in the agreement governing the account the following terms apply:

Beneficial ownership of the account vests exclusively in the minor. All interest credited to the account shall belong to the minor and shall be reported to the appropriate taxing authorities in the name of the minor using the minor’s taxpayer identification number.

Except as otherwise provided, control of the account vests exclusively in the custodian whose name appears on the bank’s records for the account. If there is more than one custodian named on the bank’s account records, each may act independently. Any one or more of the custodians named on the bank’s records may turn over control of the account to the minor at any time, either before or after the minor reaches the age of majority.

If the custodian has not already transferred control, then after the minor beneficiary reaches the age of majority, the beneficiary may instruct the bank to transfer control to the beneficiary and remove the named custodian.

If the custodian or, if more than one custodian is on the account, the last of the custodians to survive dies before the minor reaches the age of majority, the minor’s parent or the minor’s legal guardian may act as custodian or name another custodian on the account.

This section shall not be deemed exclusive. Accounts not conforming to this section shall be governed by other applicable provisions of the General Statutes, including Chapter 33A, the North Carolina Uniform Transfers to Minors Act, or the common law, as appropriate.

History.

2012-56, s. 4.

§ 53C-6-10.
Payment of balance of deceased person or person under disability to personal representative or guardian.

A bank may pay any balance on deposit to the credit of any deceased individual to the duly qualified personal representative, collector, or public administrator of the decedent who is qualified as such under the laws of any state.

A bank may pay any balance on deposit to the credit of any individual judicially declared incompetent or otherwise under a legal disability to the duly qualified personal representative, guardian, curator, conservator, or committee of the person declared incompetent or under disability who is qualified as such under the laws of any state.

The presentation of a letter of qualification as personal representative, collector, public administrator, guardian, curator, conservator, or committee of the person issued or certified by the appointing court shall be conclusive proof of the jurisdiction of the court issuing the same and sufficient authority for the payment.

Payment by a bank in good faith under the authority of this section discharges the liability of the bank to the extent of the payment.

History.

2012-56, s. 4.

§ 53C-6-11.
Powers of attorney; notice of revocation; payment after notice.

Any bank may continue to recognize any act of an attorney-in-fact or other agent until the bank receives actual notice of the principal’s death or a written notice of revocation signed by the principal who granted the authority or, in the case of a company, evidence satisfactory to the bank of the revocation. Payment by the bank to or at the direction of an attorney-in-fact or other agent before receipt of the notice is a total discharge of the bank’s obligation as to the amount so paid.

Notwithstanding that a bank has received written notice of revocation of the authority of an attorney-in-fact or other designated agent, a bank may, until 10 days after receipt of notice, pay any item made, drawn, accepted, or endorsed by the attorney-in-fact or agent prior to the revocation, provided that the item is otherwise properly payable.

History.

2012-56, s. 4.

§ 53C-6-12.
Account statements to be rendered annually or on request.

Every bank shall render an account statement for each deposit account at least annually to the depositor; provided, however, the statements are not required for time deposits. Every bank shall render a statement of account for each deposit account, including time deposits upon receipt of an appropriate request reasonably made by a depositor.

For purposes of this section, an account statement is deemed to have been “rendered” to a depositor as of the earlier of the date the statement is mailed to the depositor’s address as shown on bank records and the date the account is posted to the bank’s Web site in a manner and a form ensuring the statement to be readily available to the depositor; provided however, the bank and the depositor may agree that an account statement may be rendered by other means.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to relieve the depositor from the duty of exercising due diligence in the review of an account statement rendered by the bank and of timely notification to the bank upon discovery of any error.

History.

2012-56, s. 4.

§ 53C-6-13.
Safe deposit boxes; unpaid rentals; procedure; escheats.

If the rental due on a safe deposit box is 90 days or more past due, the lessor bank may send a notice by registered mail or certified mail, return receipt requested, to the last known address of the lessee or by another means agreed to in writing by the lessor bank and the lessee, stating that the safe deposit box will be opened and its contents stored at the expense of the lessee unless payment of the rental is made within 30 days of the date of the mailing of the notice or the date such notice is given by the means otherwise previously agreed to in writing by the lessor bank and the lessee. If the rental is not paid within the stated period, the box may be opened in the presence of an officer of the bank and of a notary public who is not a director, officer, employee, or shareholder of the bank. The contents shall be sealed in a package by the notary public, who shall write on the outside the name of the lessee and the date of the opening. The notary public shall execute a certificate reciting the name of the lessee, the date of the opening of the box, and a list of its contents. The certificate shall be included in the package, and a copy of the certificate shall be sent by registered mail or certified mail, return receipt requested, to the last known address of the lessee or by the means otherwise previously agreed to in writing by the lessor bank and the lessee. The package then shall be placed in the general vaults of the bank at a rental not exceeding the rental previously charged for the box.

If the contents of the safe deposit box have not been claimed within two years of the mailing or other permissible delivery of the copy of the certificate to the lessee, the bank may send a further notice to the last known address of the lessee by registered mail or certified mail, return receipt requested, to the last known address of the lessee or by a means otherwise previously agreed to in writing by the lessor bank and the lessee, stating that unless the accumulated charges are paid within 30 days of the date of the mailing of the notice, the contents of the box will be delivered to the State Treasurer as abandoned property under the provisions of Chapter 116B of the General Statutes.

The bank shall submit to the State Treasurer a verified inventory of all of the contents of the safe deposit box upon delivery of the contents of the box or such part thereof as shall be required by the State Treasurer under

G.S. 116B-55

, but the bank may deduct from any cash of the lessee in the safe deposit box an amount equal to accumulated charges for rental and shall submit to the State Treasurer a verified statement of the charges and deduction. If there is no cash or insufficient cash to pay accumulated charges in the safe deposit box, the bank may submit to the State Treasurer a verified statement of accumulated charges or balance of the accumulated charges due, and the State Treasurer shall remit to the bank the charges or balance due, up to the value of the property in the safe deposit box delivered to the State Treasurer, less any costs or expenses of sale; but if the charges or balance due exceeds the value of the property, the State Treasurer shall remit only the value of the property, less costs or expenses of sale. Any accumulated charges for safe deposit box rental paid by the State Treasurer to the bank shall be deducted from the value of the property of the lessee delivered to the State Treasurer.

Any property, including documents or writings of a private nature, that has little or no apparent financial value need not be sold but may be destroyed by the bank if the State Treasurer declines to receive the property under G.S. 116B-69(a).

An explanation of the contractual provisions pertaining to default, together with reference to this section, shall be printed on every contract for rental of a safe deposit box.

History.

2012-56, s. 4.

§ 53C-6-14.
Reproduction and retention of records; admissibility of copies in evidence; disposition of originals; record production generally.

Any bank may cause any or all records kept by it to be recorded, copied, or reproduced by any photographic, reproduction, electronic, or digital process or method, or by any other records retention technology approved by rule or order of the Commissioner, of a kind that is capable of accurately converting the records into tangible form within a reasonable time. Each such converted tangible form of record also shall be deemed a record.

Any tangible form of a record shall be deemed for all purposes to be an original record and shall be admissible in evidence in all courts and administrative agencies in this State, if otherwise admissible, and the bank may destroy or otherwise dispose of the original form of the record; provided, however, that a bank shall retain either the originals or convertible form of its records for such period as may be required by law or by rule or order of the Commissioner. Any bank may dispose of any original or convertible form of a record that has been retained for the period prescribed by law or by rule or order of the Commissioner for its class.

Originals and converted tangible forms of records shall not be held inadmissible in any court action or proceeding on the grounds that they lack certification, identification, or authentication and shall be received as evidence if otherwise admissible in any court or quasi-judicial proceeding if they have been identified and authenticated by the live testimony of a competent witness or if the records are accompanied by a certificate substantially in the following form:

“CERTIFICATE REGARDING BANK RECORDS

1. The accompanying documents are true and correct copies of the records of [name of bank]. The records were made in the regular course of business of the bank at or near the time of the acts, events, or conditions they reflect.2. The undersigned is authorized to execute this certificate.3. This certificate is issued pursuant to

G.S. 53C-6-14

.I certify, under penalty of perjury under the laws of the State of North Carolina, that the foregoing statements are true and correct.[Notarize as required by law for an affidavit]”

Date:
_______________
_________

Signature

_________

Print or type name

_________

Title

This section supplements and does not supersede

G.S. 8-45.1

.

History.

2012-56, s. 4.